Washington statutes.
RCW 1.50.010

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Organ donor" means an individual who makes an anatomical gift of an organ under chapter 68.64 RCW.

(2) "Organ procurement organization" has the same meaning as in RCW 68.64.010.

[ 2015 c 8 s 2; 2008 c 139 s 25; 1998 c 59 s 2.]

NOTES:

Uniformity of application and construction—2008 c 139: See RCW 68.64.902.